Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 2. Creation, Alteration, and Termination of Condominiums.
§ 55.1-1920.
Contents of plats and plans.

There shall be recorded simultaneously with the declaration one or more plats of survey showing the location and dimensions of the submitted land, the location and dimensions of any convertible lands within the submitted land, the location and dimensions of any existing improvements, the intended location and dimensions of any contemplated improvements that are to be located on any portion of the submitted land other than within the boundaries of any convertible lands, and, to the extent feasible, the location and dimensions of all easements appurtenant to the submitted land or otherwise subject to this chapter as a part of the common elements. If the submitted land is not contiguous, then the plats shall indicate the distances between the parcels constituting the submitted land. The plats shall label every convertible land as a convertible land, and if there is more than one such land, the plats shall label each such land with one or more letters or numbers different from those designating any other convertible land and different also from the identifying number of any unit. The plats shall show the location and dimensions of any withdrawable lands and shall label each such land as a withdrawable land. The plats shall show the location and dimensions of any additional lands and shall label each such land as an additional land. If, with respect to any portion, but less than all, of the submitted land, the unit owners are to own only an estate for years, the plats shall show the location and dimensions of any such portion, and shall label each such portion as a leased land. If there is more than one withdrawable land, or more than one leased land, the plats shall label each such land with one or more letters or numbers different from those designating any convertible land or other withdrawable or leased land, and different also from the identifying number of any unit. The plats shall show all easements to which the submitted land or any portion of such submitted land is subject and shall show the location and dimensions of all such easements to the extent feasible. The plats shall also show all encroachments by or on any portion of the condominium. In the case of any improvements located or to be located on any portion of the submitted land other than within the boundaries of any convertible lands, the plats shall indicate which, if any, have not been begun by the use of the phrase “NOT YET BEGUN” and which, if any, have been begun but have not been substantially completed by the use of the phrase “NOT YET COMPLETED.” In the case of any units the vertical boundaries of which lie wholly or partially outside of structures for which plans pursuant to subsection B are simultaneously recorded, the plats shall show the location and dimensions of such vertical boundaries to the extent that they are not shown on such plans, and the units or portions thereof thus depicted shall bear their identifying numbers. Each plat shall be certified in a recorded document as to its accuracy and compliance with the provisions of this subsection by a licensed land surveyor, and the surveyor shall certify in such document or on the face of the plat that all units or portions of such units depicted on such plat pursuant to the preceding sentence of this subsection have been substantially completed. The specification within this subsection of items that shall be shown on the plats shall not be construed to mean that the plats shall not also show all other items customarily shown or hereafter required for land title surveys.

Plans shall also be recorded with the declaration. Such plans shall show every structure that contains or constitutes all or part of any unit and that is located on any portion of the submitted land other than within the boundaries of any convertible lands. The plans shall show the location and dimensions of the vertical boundaries of each unit to the extent that such boundaries lie within or coincide with the boundaries of such structures, and the units or portions of the submitted units so depicted shall bear their identifying numbers. In addition, each convertible space so depicted shall be labeled as convertible space. The horizontal boundaries of each unit having horizontal boundaries shall be identified on the plans with reference to established datum. Unless the condominium instruments expressly provide otherwise, it shall be presumed that in the case of any unit not wholly contained within or constituting one or more such structures, the horizontal boundaries thus identified extend, in the case of each such unit, at the same elevation with regard to any part of such unit, lying outside of such structures, subject to the following exception: In the case of any such unit that does not lie over any other unit other than basement units, it shall be presumed that the lower horizontal boundary, if any, of that unit lies at the level of the ground with regard to any part of that unit lying outside of such structures. The plans shall be certified on their face or in another recorded document as to their accuracy and compliance with the provisions of this subsection by a licensed architect, licensed engineer, or licensed land surveyor, and such architect, engineer, or land surveyor shall certify on the plans or in the recorded document that all units or portions of the submitted units depicted on such plans have been substantially completed.

When converting all or any portion of any convertible land, or adding additional land to an expandable condominium, the declarant shall record, with regard to any structures on the land being converted or added, either plats of survey conforming to the requirements of subsection A and plans conforming to the requirements of subsection B, or certifications conforming to the certification requirements of such subsections of plats and plans previously recorded pursuant to §

55.1-1922

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections A and B, a time-share interest in a unit that has been subjected to a time-share instrument pursuant to §

55.1-2208

may be conveyed prior to substantial completion of that unit if (i) a completion bond has been filed in compliance with subsection B of §

55.1-1921

and remains in full force and effect until the unit is certified as substantially complete in accordance with subsections A and B and (ii) the settlement agent or title insurance company insuring the time-share estate in the unit certifies to the purchaser in writing, based on information provided by the Common Interest Community Board, that the bond has been filed with the Common Interest Community Board.

When converting all or any portion of any convertible space into one or more units or limited common elements, the declarant shall record, with regard to the structure or portion of such structure constituting that convertible space, plans showing the location and dimensions of the vertical boundaries of each unit or limited common elements formed out of such space. Such plans shall be certified as to their accuracy and compliance with the provisions of this subsection by a licensed architect, licensed engineer, or licensed land surveyor.

For the purposes of subsections A, B, and C, all provisions and requirements relating to units shall be deemed equally applicable to limited common elements. The limited common elements shall be labeled as such, and each limited common element depicted on the plats and plans shall show the identifying number of the unit to which it is assigned, if it has been assigned, unless the provisions of subdivision 5 of §

55.1-1912

make such designations unnecessary.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.58; 1975, c. 415; 1984, c. 601; 1991, c. 497; 1999, c. 560; 2008, cc. 851, 871; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1921.
Bond to insure completion of improvements.

The declarant shall file with the Common Interest Community Board a bond entered into by the declarant in the sum of 100 percent of the estimated cost of completion, to the extent of the declarant’s obligation as stated in the declaration, of all improvements to the common elements of the condominium labeled in the plat or plats as “NOT YET COMPLETED” or “NOT YET BEGUN” located upon submitted land and which the declarant reasonably believes will not be substantially complete at the time of conveyance of the first condominium unit. Such bond shall be conditioned upon the faithful performance of the declarant’s obligation to complete such improvements in strict conformity with the plans and specifications for the same as described in the declaration.

The declarant shall file with the Common Interest Community Board a bond entered into by the declarant in the sum of 100 percent of the estimated cost of completion of a unit in which a time-share interest is conveyed before the unit has been certified as substantially complete in accordance with subsections A and B of §

55.1-1920

. The bond required by this subsection shall be conditioned upon the faithful performance of the declarant’s obligation to complete such improvements in strict conformity with the plans and specifications for the same as described in the declaration.

All bonds required in this section shall be executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth or by such other surety as is satisfactory to the Board.

The Board may promulgate reasonable regulations that govern the return of bonds submitted in accordance with this section.

History.

1977, c. 428, § 55-79.58:1; 1988, c. 15; 1999, c. 560; 2008, cc. 851, 871; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1922.
Preliminary recordation of plats and plans.

Plats and plans previously recorded pursuant to subsections A, B, and C of §

55.1-1916

may be used in lieu of new plats and plans to satisfy in whole or in part the requirements of subsection B of §

55.1-1918

, subsection B of §

55.1-1924

, or §

55.1-1926

if certifications of such plats and plans are recorded by the declarant in accordance with subsections A and B of §

55.1-1920

; and if such certifications are recorded, the plats and plans that they certify shall be deemed recorded pursuant to subsection C of §

55.1-1920

within the meaning of §§

55.1-1918

,

55.1-1924

, and

55.1-1926

. All condominium instruments for condominiums created prior to July 1, 1991, are hereby validated notwithstanding that the plats were prerecorded as if in compliance with this section and not recorded with amendments converting convertible land or adding additional land if the plats or subsequent amendments contained the required certifications.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.59; 1991, c. 497; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1923.
Easement for encroachments.

To the extent that any unit or common element encroaches on any other unit or common element, whether by reason of any deviation from the plats and plans in the construction, repair, renovation, restoration, or replacement of any improvement or by reason of the settling or shifting of any land or improvement, a valid easement for such encroachment shall exist. The purpose of this section is to protect the unit owners, except in cases of willful and intentional misconduct by them or their agents or employees, and not to relieve the declarant or any contractor, subcontractor, or materialman of any liability which any of them may have by reason of any failure to adhere strictly to the plats and plans.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.60; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1924.
Conversion of convertible lands.

The declarant may convert all or any portion of any convertible land into one or more units or limited common elements subject to any restrictions and limitations that the condominium instruments may specify. Any such conversion shall be deemed to have occurred at the time of the recordation of appropriate instruments pursuant to subsection B of this section and subsection C of §

55.1-1920

.

Simultaneously with the recording of plats and plans pursuant to subsection C of §

55.1-1920

, the declarant shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration describing the conversion. Such amendment shall assign an identifying number to each unit formed out of a convertible land and shall reallocate undivided interests in the common elements in accordance with subsection B of §

55.1-1918

. Such amendment shall describe or delineate any limited common elements formed out of the convertible land, showing or designating the unit to which each is assigned.

All convertible lands shall be deemed a part of the common elements except for such portions of such convertible lands as are converted in accordance with the provisions of this section. Until the expiration of the period during which conversion may occur or until actual conversion, whichever occurs first, the declarant alone shall be liable for real estate taxes assessed against the convertible land and any improvements on such convertible land and all other expenses in connection with that real estate, and no other unit owner and no other portion of the condominium shall be subject to a claim for payment of those taxes or expenses, and, unless the declaration provides otherwise, any income or proceeds from the convertible land and any improvements on such convertible land shall inure to the declarant. No such conversion shall occur after 10 years from the recordation of the declaration, or such shorter period of time as the declaration may specify.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.61; 1975, c. 415; 1986, c. 324; 1991, c. 497; 1993, c. 45; 2012, c. 520; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1925.
Conversion of convertible spaces.

The declarant may convert all or any portion of any convertible space into one or more units or common elements, including limited common elements, subject to any restrictions and limitations that the condominium instruments may specify. Any such conversion shall be deemed to have occurred at the time of the recordation of appropriate instruments pursuant to subsection B and subsection E of §

55.1-1920

.

Simultaneously with the recording of plats and plans pursuant to subsection E of §

55.1-1920

, the declarant shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration describing the conversion. Such amendment shall assign an identifying number to each unit formed out of a convertible space and shall allocate to each unit a portion of the undivided interest in the common elements appertaining to that space. Such amendment shall describe or delineate any limited common elements formed out of the convertible space, showing or designating the unit to which each is assigned.

If all or any portion of any convertible space is converted into one or more units in accordance with this section, the declarant shall prepare and execute, and record simultaneously with the amendment to the declaration, an amendment to the bylaws. The amendment to the bylaws shall reallocate votes in the unit owners’ association, rights to future common profits, and liabilities for future common expenses not specially assessed, all as in the case of the subdivision of a unit in accordance with subsection D of §

55.1-1933

.

Any convertible space not converted in accordance with the provisions of this section, or any portion of such convertible space not so converted, shall be treated for all purposes as a single unit until and unless it is so converted, and the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed applicable to any such convertible space, or portion of such convertible space, as though the same were a unit.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.62; 1999, c. 560; 2019, c. 712.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “subsection E” was substituted for “subsection B” to correct an error in the 2019 act.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1926.
Expansion of condominium.

No condominium shall be expanded except in accordance with the provisions of the declaration and of this chapter. Any such expansion shall be deemed to have occurred at the time of the recordation of plats and plans pursuant to subsection C of §

55.1-1920

, together with an amendment to the declaration, duly executed by the declarant, including all of the owners and lessees of the additional land added to the condominium. Such amendment shall contain a legal description by metes and bounds of the land added to the condominium and shall reallocate undivided interests in the common elements in accordance with the provisions of subsection B of §

55.1-1918

. Such amendment may create convertible or withdrawable lands or both within the land added to the condominium, but this provision shall not be construed in derogation of the time limits imposed by or pursuant to subdivision D 3 of §

55.1-1916

and subsection C of §

55.1-1924

.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.63; 1975, c. 415; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1927.
Contraction of condominium.

No condominium shall be contracted except in accordance with the provisions of the declaration and of this chapter. Any such contraction shall be deemed to have occurred at the time of the recordation of an amendment to the declaration, executed by the declarant, containing a legal description by metes and bounds of the land withdrawn from the condominium. If portions of the withdrawable land were described pursuant to subdivision D 5 of §

55.1-1916

, then no such portion shall be so withdrawn after the conveyance of any unit on such portion. If no such portions were described, then none of the withdrawable land shall be withdrawn after the first conveyance of any unit.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.64; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1928.
Easement to facilitate conversion and expansion.

Subject to any restrictions and limitations the condominium instruments may specify, the declarant shall have a transferable easement over and on the common elements for the purpose of making improvements on the submitted land and any additional land pursuant to the provisions of those instruments and of this chapter and for the purpose of doing all things reasonably necessary and proper in connection with making such improvements.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.65; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1929.
Easement to facilitate sales.

The declarant and his duly authorized agents, representatives, and employees may maintain sales offices or model units on the submitted land if and only if the condominium instruments provide for maintaining such sales offices or model units and specify the rights of the declarant with regard to the number, size, location, and relocation of such sales offices or model units. Any such sales office or model unit that is not designated a unit by the condominium instruments shall become a common element as soon as the declarant ceases to be a unit owner, and the declarant shall cease to have any rights with regard to such sales office or model unit unless it is removed forthwith from the submitted land in accordance with a right reserved in the condominium instruments to make such removal.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.66; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1930.
Declarant’s obligation to complete and restore.

No covenants, restrictions, limitations, or other representations or commitments in the condominium instruments with regard to anything that is or is not to be done on the additional land, the withdrawable land, or any portion of either shall be binding as to any portion of either lawfully withdrawn from the condominium or never added to the condominium, except to the extent that the condominium instruments so provide. But in the case of any covenant, restriction, limitation, or other representation or commitment in the condominium instruments or in any other agreement requiring the declarant to add all or any portion of the additional land or to withdraw any portion of the withdrawable land, or imposing any obligations with regard to anything that is or is not to be done on such land or with regard to such land, or imposing any obligations with regard to anything that is or is not to be done on or with regard to the condominium or any portion of such condominium, this subsection shall not be construed to nullify, limit, or otherwise affect any such obligation.

The declarant shall complete all improvements labeled “NOT YET COMPLETED” on plats recorded pursuant to the requirements of this chapter unless the condominium instruments expressly exempt the declarant from such obligation and shall, in the case of every improvement labeled “NOT YET BEGUN” on such plats, state in the declaration either the extent of the obligation to complete the same or that there is no such obligation.

To the extent that damage is inflicted on any part of the condominium by any person utilizing the easements reserved by the condominium instruments or created by §§

55.1-1928

and

55.1-1929

, the declarant together with any person causing the same shall be jointly and severally liable for the prompt repair of such damage and for the restoration of the same to a condition compatible with the remainder of the condominium.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.67; 1975, c. 415; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1931.
Alterations within units.

Except to the extent prohibited, restricted, or limited by the condominium instruments, any unit owner may make any improvements or alterations within his unit that do not impair the structural integrity of any structure or otherwise lessen the support of any portion of the condominium. However, no unit owner shall do anything that would change the exterior appearance of his unit or of any other portion of the condominium except to such extent and subject to such conditions as the condominium instruments may specify.

If a unit owner acquires an adjoining unit, or an adjoining part of an adjoining unit, then such unit owner shall have the right to remove all or any part of any intervening partition or to create doorways or other apertures in such unit, notwithstanding the fact that such partition may in whole or in part be a common element, so long as no portion of any bearing wall or bearing column is weakened or removed and no portion of any common element other than that partition is damaged, destroyed, or endangered. Such creation of doorways or other apertures shall not be deemed an alteration of boundaries within the meaning of §

55.1-1932

.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.68; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1932.
Relocation of boundaries between units.

If the condominium instruments expressly permit the relocation of boundaries between adjoining units, then the boundaries between such units may be relocated in accordance with (i) the provisions of this section and (ii) any restrictions and limitations not otherwise unlawful that the condominium instruments may specify. The boundaries between adjoining units shall not be relocated unless the condominium instruments expressly permit it.

If the unit owners of adjoining units whose mutual boundaries may be relocated desire to relocate such boundaries, then the principal officer of the unit owners’ association, or such other officer as the condominium instruments may specify, shall, upon written application of such unit owners, forthwith prepare and execute appropriate instruments pursuant to subsections C, D, and E.

An amendment to the declaration shall identify the units involved and shall state that the boundaries between those units are being relocated by agreement of the unit owners of such units, and the amendment shall contain conveyancing between those unit owners. If the unit owners of the units involved have specified in their written application a reasonable reallocation as between the units involved of the aggregate undivided interest in the common elements appertaining to those units, the amendment to the declaration shall reflect that reallocation.

If the unit owners of the units involved have specified in their written application a reasonable reallocation as between the units involved of the aggregate number of votes in the unit owners’ association allocated to those units, an amendment to the bylaws shall reflect that reallocation and a proportionate reallocation of liability for common expenses as between those units.

Such plats and plans as may be necessary to show the altered boundaries between the units involved together with their other boundaries shall be prepared, and the units depicted on such plats and plans shall bear their identifying numbers. Such plats and plans shall indicate the new dimensions of the units involved, and any change in the horizontal boundaries of either as a result of the relocation of their boundaries shall be identified with reference to established datum. Such plats and plans shall be certified as to their accuracy and compliance with the provisions of this subsection (i) by a licensed land surveyor in the case of any plat and (ii) by a licensed architect, licensed engineer, or licensed land surveyor in the case of any plan.

When appropriate instruments in accordance with this section have been prepared, executed, and acknowledged, they shall be recorded by an officer of the unit owners’ association following payment by the unit owners of the units involved of all reasonable costs for the preparation, acknowledgment, and recordation of such instruments. Such instruments are effective when executed by the unit owners of the units involved and recorded, and the recordation of such instruments is conclusive evidence that the relocation of boundaries so effectuated did not violate any restrictions or limitations specified by the condominium instruments and that any reallocations made pursuant to subsections C and D were reasonable.

Any relocation of boundaries between adjoining units shall be governed by this section and not by §

55.1-1933

. Section

55.1-1933

shall apply only to such subdivisions of units as are intended to result in the creation of two or more new units in place of the subdivided unit.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.69; 1991, c. 497; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1933.
Subdivision of units.

If the condominium instruments expressly permit the subdivision of any units, then such units may be subdivided in accordance with (i) the provisions of this section and (ii) any restrictions and limitations not otherwise unlawful that the condominium instruments may specify. No unit shall be subdivided unless the condominium instruments expressly permit it.

If the unit owner of any unit that may be subdivided desires to subdivide such unit, then the principal officer of the unit owners’ association, or such other officer as the condominium instruments may specify, shall, upon written application of the subdivider, as such unit owner shall hereinafter be referred to in this section, forthwith prepare and execute appropriate instruments pursuant to subsections C, D, and E.

An amendment to the declaration shall assign new identifying numbers to the new units created by the subdivision of a unit and shall allocate to those units, on a reasonable basis acceptable to the subdivider, all of the undivided interest in the common elements appertaining to the subdivided unit. The new units shall jointly share all rights, and shall be equally liable jointly and severally for all obligations, with regard to any limited common elements assigned to the subdivided unit except to the extent that the subdivider may have specified in his written application that all or any portions of any limited common element assigned to the subdivided unit exclusively should be assigned to one or more, but less than all of the new units, in which case the amendment to the declaration shall reflect the desires of the subdivider as expressed in such written application.

An amendment to the bylaws shall allocate to the new units, on a reasonable basis acceptable to the subdivider, the votes in the unit owners’ association allocated to the subdivided unit and shall reflect a proportionate allocation to the new units of the liability for common expenses formerly appertaining to the subdivided unit.

Such plats and plans as may be necessary to show the boundaries separating the new units together with their other boundaries shall be prepared, and the new units depicted on such plats and plans shall bear their new identifying numbers. Such plats and plans shall indicate the dimensions of the new units, and the horizontal boundaries of such units, if any, shall be identified on such plats and plans with reference to established datum. Such plats and plans shall be certified as to their accuracy and compliance with the provisions of this subsection (i) by a licensed land surveyor in the case of any plat and (ii) by a licensed architect, licensed engineer, or licensed land surveyor in the case of any plan.

When appropriate instruments in accordance with this section have been prepared, executed, and acknowledged, they shall be recorded by an officer of the unit owners’ association following payment by the subdivider of all reasonable costs for the preparation, acknowledgment, and recordation of such instruments. Such instruments are effective when executed by the subdivider and recorded, and the recordation of such instruments is conclusive evidence that the subdivision so effectuated did not violate any restrictions or limitations specified by the condominium instruments and that any reallocations made pursuant to subsections C and D were reasonable.

Notwithstanding the definition of “unit” found in §

55.1-1900

and the provisions of subsection D of §

55.1-1925

, this section shall have no application to convertible spaces, and no such space shall be deemed a unit for the purposes of this section. However, this section shall apply to any units formed by the conversion of all or any portion of any such convertible space, and any such unit shall be deemed a unit for the purposes of this section.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.70; 1991, c. 497; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1934.
Amendment of condominium instruments.

If there is no unit owner other than the declarant, the declarant may unilaterally amend the condominium instruments, and an amendment signed by the declarant is effective upon recordation. This section shall not be construed to nullify, limit, or otherwise affect the validity of enforceability of any agreement renouncing or to renounce, in whole or in part, the right hereby conferred.

If any of the units in the condominium is restricted exclusively to residential use and there is any unit owner other than the declarant, the condominium instruments shall be amended only by agreement of unit owners of units to which two-thirds of the votes in the unit owners’ association appertain, or such larger majority as the condominium instruments may specify, except in cases for which this chapter provides different methods of amendment. If none of the units in the condominium is restricted exclusively to residential use, the condominium instruments may specify a majority smaller than the minimum specified in the preceding sentence.

An action to challenge the validity of an amendment adopted by the unit owners’ association pursuant to this section may not be brought more than one year after the amendment is recorded.

Agreement of the required majority of unit owners to any amendment of the condominium instruments shall be evidenced by their execution of the amendment, or ratifications of such amendment, and the same is effective when a copy of the amendment is recorded together with a certification, signed by the principal officer of the unit owners’ association or by such other officer as the condominium instruments may specify, that the requisite majority of the unit owners signed the amendment or ratifications of such amendment.

Except to the extent expressly permitted or expressly required by other provisions of this chapter or agreed to by 100 percent of the unit owners, no amendment to the condominium instruments shall change (i) the boundaries of any unit, (ii) the undivided interest in the common elements, (iii) the liability for common expenses, or (iv) the number of votes in the unit owners’ association that appertains to any unit.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the declarant may unilaterally execute and record a corrective amendment or supplement to the condominium instruments to correct a mathematical mistake, an inconsistency, or a scrivener’s error or clarify an ambiguity in the condominium instruments with respect to an objectively verifiable fact, including recalculating the undivided interest in the common elements, the liability for common expenses or the number of votes in the unit owners’ association appertaining to a unit, within five years after the recordation of the condominium instrument containing or creating such mistake, inconsistency, error, or ambiguity. No such amendment or supplement may materially reduce what the obligations of the declarant would have been if the mistake, inconsistency, error, or ambiguity had not occurred. Regardless of the date of recordation of the condominium instruments, the principal officer of the unit owners’ association may also unilaterally execute and record such a corrective amendment or supplement upon a vote of two-thirds of the members of the executive board. All corrective amendments and supplements recorded prior to July 1, 1986, are hereby validated to the extent that such corrective amendments and supplements would have been permitted by this subsection.

History.

1974, c. 416, § 55-79.71; 1993, c. 667; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1935.
Use of technology.

Unless expressly prohibited by the condominium instruments, (i) any notice required to be sent or received or (ii) any signature, vote, consent, or approval required to be obtained under any condominium instrument or any provision of this chapter may be accomplished using electronic means.

The unit owners’ association, unit owners, and other persons entitled to occupy a unit may perform any obligation or exercise any right under any condominium instrument or any provision of this chapter by use of electronic means.

An electronic signature meeting the requirements of applicable law shall satisfy any requirement for a signature under any condominium instrument or any provision of this chapter.

Voting, consent to, and approval of any matter under any condominium instrument or any provision of this chapter may be accomplished by electronic means provided that a record is created as evidence of such vote, consent, or approval and maintained as long as such record would be required to be maintained in nonelectronic form. If the vote, consent, or approval is required to be obtained by secret ballot, the electronic means shall protect the identity of the voter. If the electronic means cannot protect the identity of the voter, another means of voting shall be used.

Subject to other provisions of law, no action required or permitted by any condominium instrument or any provision of this chapter need be acknowledged before a notary public if the identity and signature of such person can otherwise be authenticated to the satisfaction of the executive board.

Any meeting of the unit owners’ association, the executive board, or any committee may be held entirely or partially by electronic means, provided that the executive board has adopted guidelines for the use of electronic means for such meetings. Such guidelines shall ensure that persons accessing such meetings are authorized to do so and that persons entitled to participate in such meetings have an opportunity to do so. The executive board shall determine whether any such meeting may be held entirely or partially by electronic means.

If any person does not have the capability or desire to conduct business using electronic means, the unit owners’ association shall make available a reasonable alternative, at its expense, for such person to conduct business with the unit owners’ association without use of such electronic means.

This section shall not apply to any notice related to an enforcement action by the unit owners’ association, an assessment lien, or foreclosure proceedings in enforcement of an assessment lien.

History.

2010, c. 432, § 55-79.71:1; 2019, c. 712; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 9, 494.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 9 and 494, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “expressly prohibited by” and deleted “expressly provide otherwise” following “the condominium instruments”; in subsection D, added the last two sentences; added subsection F and redesignated remaining subsections; and in subsection G, substituted “shall make available a reasonable alternative” for “shall make reasonable accommodation.”